Utah statutes.
6-1-12.   Time for disposing of property.

The assignee shall dispose of all personal property and divide the proceeds of the same among the creditors as they may be entitled thereto within six months from the date of the assignment, unless further time is given for good cause by the court, and shall dispose of real estate within one year from such date, and make full settlement by that time, unless the court or judge, for good reason shown, shall extend the time therefor.

